apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="skil/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lte</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lende</l>     <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
 <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>          <r>le<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ige__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ige</l>       <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iger</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iges</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igende</l>    <r>ige<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>agt</l>         <r>ige<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>         <r>ige<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>        <r>ige<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>          <r>ige<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<pardef n="g/øre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øre</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorde</l>     <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>  <!-- gjordes rent -->
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørende</l>    <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>         <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>         <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorte</l>        <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorte</l>          <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<pardef n="f/are__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arer</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ares</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aret</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arende</l>    <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>         <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>         <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arne</l>        <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arne</l>        <r>are<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="v/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idste</l>     <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idst</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>    <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>idst</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idst</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idste</l>        <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idste</l>          <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ægge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æg</l>        <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægge</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægger</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægges</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æggende</l>   <r>ægge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
 <e>       <p><l>agt</l>         <r>ægge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>         <r>ægge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>        <r>ægge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agte</l>          <r>ægge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="s/idde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idder</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddes</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddet</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddende</l>   <r>idde<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddet</l>         <r>idde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddet</l>         <r>idde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>        <r>idde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>          <r>idde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="anlægge">            <i>anl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslaglægge">        <i>beslagl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bevidstgøre">        <i>bevidstg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blidgøre">           <i>blidg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blødgøre">           <i>blødg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blødlægge">          <i>blødl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="båndlægge">          <i>båndl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bødelægge">          <i>bødel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fare">               <i>f</i><par n="f/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="farvelægge">         <i>farvel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fliselægge">         <i>flisel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skumlægge">         <i>skuml</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forgøre">            <i>forg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forlægge">           <i>forl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forudsige">          <i>foruds</i><par n="s/ige__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fremlægge">          <i>freml</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fremmedgøre">        <i>fremmedg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frigøre">            <i>frig</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="færdiggøre">         <i>færdigg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genlægge">           <i>genl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="godtgøre">           <i>godtg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gruslægge">          <i>grusl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gøre rent">          <i>g</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>rent</l><r><g><b/>rent</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="gøre">               <i>g</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hellelægge">         <i>hellel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="herliggøre">         <i>herligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iblødlægge">       <i>iblødl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indlægge">         <i>indl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klargøre">          <i>klarg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klarlægge">         <i>klarl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kortlægge">         <i>kortl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kundgøre">           <i>kundg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="latterliggøre">      <i>latterligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lægge">              <i>l</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mistænkeliggøre">    <i>mistænkeligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mørklægge">          <i>mørkl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nyttiggøre">         <i>nyttigg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="offentliggøre">      <i>offentligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omlægge">            <i>oml</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="personliggøre">      <i>personligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="planlægge">          <i>planl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pålægge">            <i>pål</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rengøre">            <i>reng</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sandsynliggøre">     <i>sandsynligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sidde fast ">   <i>s</i><par n="s/idde__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fast</l><r><g><b/>fast</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sidde">              <i>s</i><par n="s/idde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sige">               <i>s</i><par n="s/ige__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skille">             <i>skil</i><par n="skil/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skrinlægge">         <i>skrinl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stenlægge">          <i>stenl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilbagelægge">       <i>tilbagel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilintetgøre">       <i>tilintetg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilrettelægge">      <i>tilrettel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tingsliggøre">       <i>tingsligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tågelægge">          <i>tågel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tørlægge">           <i>tørl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udgøre">             <i>udg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ufarliggøre">        <i>ufarligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ugøre">              <i>ug</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="umenneskeliggøre">   <i>umenneskeligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="umyndiggøre">        <i>umyndigg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vanskeliggøre">      <i>vanskeligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vide">               <i>v</i><par n="v/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="virkeliggøre">       <i>virkeligg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ødelægge">           <i>ødel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
